Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-606
License; application; fee; financial statement; form.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association desiring to engage in this state in the collection business as defined in the Collection Agency Act shall make written and sworn application for a license therefor to the board upon a form to be prescribed by the board, which application shall be accompanied by an investigation fee of not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars. The amount of the fee shall be fixed by the board and shall not exceed the amount actually necessary to sustain the administration and enforcement of the act. Such application shall be accompanied by a duly verified financial statement of the applicant in form prescribed by the board.

Laws 1963, c. 500, § 10, p. 1596;

Laws 1974, LB 639, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-8,167;

Laws 1984, LB 471, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 206, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 261, § 6.